Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-208
School lands; sale; deed; recording; received in evidence.

When the Board of Educational Lands and Funds becomes satisfied that full payment has been made on any tract of land sold by the state, the Governor shall issue a deed to the purchaser or his assigns, and all deeds issued by him shall be countersigned by the Secretary of State and under the Great Seal of the state, and shall be attested by the secretary of the board and a record kept in his office. All deeds so issued shall be subject to record, and shall be received in evidence without acknowledgment, the same as deeds that have been acknowledged.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 7, p. 303;

R.S.1913, § 5851;

C.S.1922, § 5187;

C.S.1929, § 72-207;

Laws 1935, c. 163, § 6, p. 597;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-207;

R.S.1943, § 72-208;

Laws 1965, c. 435, § 1, p. 1385.